Hawaii statutes.
§321-353 Hawaii early intervention
coordinating council; establishment. (a) There is established within the
department for administrative purposes the Hawaii early intervention
coordinating council. Members shall be appointed for three-year terms by the
governor without the necessity of the advice and consent of the senate. The
council shall comprise twenty-five members as follows:

(1) At least twenty per cent of the members shall be
parents of infants or toddlers with special needs, or children with special
needs aged twelve years or younger, with knowledge of, or experience with,
programs for infants and toddlers with special needs; provided that at least
one parent shall be a parent of an infant or toddler with special needs, or of
a child with special needs aged six years or younger;

(2) At least twenty per cent of the members shall be
public or private providers of early intervention services;

(3) Two members shall be from the legislature, of
which one member shall be selected by the president of the senate and one
member shall be selected by the speaker of the house of representatives;

(4) One member shall be involved in personnel
preparation;

(5) One member shall be from the department of health
program involved in the provision of, or payment for, early intervention
services to infants and toddlers with special needs and their families who has
sufficient authority to engage in policy planning and implementation on behalf
of the program;

(6) One member shall be from the department of health
program responsible for children’s mental health;

(7) One member shall be from the department of
education program responsible for preschool services to children with
disabilities who has sufficient authority to engage in policy planning and
implementation on behalf of the program;

(8) One member shall be from the department of
education program responsible for the coordination of education of homeless
children and youths;

(9) One member shall be from the department of human
services program responsible for the state medicaid program;

(10) One member shall be from the department of human
services program responsible for child care;

(11) One member shall be from the department of human
services program responsible for foster care;

(12) One member shall be from the department of
commerce and consumer affairs program responsible for state regulation of
health insurance;

(13) One member shall be from a Head Start or Early
Head Start agency or program in the State; and

(14) Other members involved in or interested in
services to infants and toddlers with special needs and their families who are
selected by the governor.

Any vacancy on the council shall be filled in
the same manner in which the original position was filled.

(b) The council shall elect its officers, and
thirteen members shall constitute a quorum. Members shall serve without
compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses,
necessary for the performance of their duties. No member shall cast a vote on
any matter that is likely to provide a direct financial benefit to that member
or otherwise give the appearance of a conflict of interest. No member from an
executive or administrative department under chapter 26 may serve as the
chairperson of the council.

(c) The council shall meet at least quarterly
and in such places as it deems necessary. The meetings shall be publicly
announced, and be open and accessible to the general public.

(d) The council shall perform the following
functions:

(1) Advise and assist the director in the
identification of the sources of fiscal and other support for services for
early intervention programs, assignment of financial responsibility to the
appropriate agency, and the promotion of the interagency agreements;

(2) Advise and assist the department in the
preparation of applications and amendments thereto;

(3) Advise and assist the department of education
regarding the transition of toddlers with special needs to preschool and other
appropriate services; and

(4) Prepare and submit an annual report to the
governor on the status of early intervention programs for infants and toddlers
with special needs and their families within the State. [L 1989, c 107, pt of
§2; am L 1996, c 298, §3; am L 2012, c 96, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next